Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
Article 2 Cotton

2-14-20.
Sale of cottonseed hulls without having weight stamped on package.

Any person, firm, or corporation who sells cottonseed hulls in bales or packages without having the weight thereof plainly stamped or branded on each bale or package shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1901, p. 63, § 1; Penal Code 1910, § 566; Code 1933, § 5-9913.

Cross references.

Use and advertisement of weights and measures generally, §

10-2-1

.

Warehouse storage of cotton generally, §

10-4-70

et seq.